Hawaii statutes.
Rule 102 Purpose and construction.
These rules shall be construed to secure fairness in administration,
elimination of unjustifiable expense and delay, and promotion of growth and
development of the law of evidence to the end that the truth may be ascertained
and proceedings justly determined. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1]

RULE 102 COMMENTARY

This rule is identical with Fed. R. Evid. 102. It
parallels similar provisions in the Hawaii Rules of Court, see HRCrP 2, HRCP 1,
and HFCR 1. Except for Articles III and V, these rules have as their model the
Federal Rules of Evidence (Fed. R. Evid.), 28 U.S.C. app., at 539 (1976), as
amended, 28 U.S.C.A. Fed. R. Evid. (Supp. 1979). Accordingly, the commentary
to each rule (except in Articles III and V) indicates whether the rule is
identical with or differs from the counterpart federal rule. The intent is to
make applicable, as an aid in construction, the federal decisional law
construing identical or similar Fed. R. Evid. provisions. Other sources for
these rules, noted from time to time in the commentaries, are the Uniform Rule
of Evidence and the Cal. Evid. Code (especially for Article III).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next